Mississippi, session 2026, HB220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This section shall be known as the "Mississippi Hospice and Palliative Care Study and Advisory Committee Act." (2)  The purpose of this section is to establish a committee to study and provide recommendations on hospice and palliative care in Mississippi, including identifying gaps in care, addressing workforce challenges, and improving end-of-life care services.  The committee shall assess cost-saving measures, the impact of hospice care on reducing inpatient hospital visits, and process improvements for end-of-life care for the incarcerated population. (2)  (a)  There is established the Hospice and Palliative Care Study and Advisory Committee (hereinafter referred to as the "committee"). (b)  The committee shall consist of thirteen (13) members, as follows: (i)  Two (2) members of the Mississippi State Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (ii)  Two (2) members of the Mississippi House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House; (iii)  One (1) representative from the State Department of Health; (iv)  One (1) representative from the Mississippi Division of Medicaid; (v)  One (1) representative from the Mississippi Department of Corrections; (vi)  Two (2) representatives from licensed hospice and palliative care providers; (vii)  One (1) physician specializing in palliative care or geriatric medicine; (viii)  One (1) registered nurse with hospice or palliative care experience; (ix)  One (1) representative from the Mississippi Hospital Association; and (x)  One (1) representative from a nonprofit health care advocacy organization. (c)  The committee shall elect a chair and vice-chair from its membership. (d)  Members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses related to committee activities, including mileage, as provided in Section 25-3-41, subject to funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose. (3)  The committee shall: (a)  Conduct a comprehensive study on the state of hospice and palliative care in Mississippi, including identifying gaps in service delivery, workforce shortages, and access disparities; (b)  Assess the financial impact of hospice and palliative care services, focusing on cost savings through reduced inpatient hospital visits and emergency room use; (c)  Evaluate care for the incarcerated population, including policies, care standards, and coordination between health care providers and correctional facilities; (d)  Identify best practices for expanding access to care in rural and underserved communities; and (e)  Develop recommendations for process improvements, training initiatives, and policy changes needed to enhance end-of-life care in the state. (4)  (a)  The committee shall submit a comprehensive report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House, and relevant legislative committees no later than December 1, 2026. (b)  The report shall include: (i)  Findings on current hospice and palliative care service availability; (ii)  Cost-savings data related to reduced inpatient hospital visits; (iii)  Identified service gaps and workforce needs; (iv)  Recommended policy changes for improved care, including end-of-life care for the incarcerated population; and (v)  Legislative or administrative action recommendations. (5)  The committee shall be dissolved on July 1, 2027, unless reauthorized by the Legislature. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.